xetex/share/texmf-dist/tex/generic/hyphen/uni-cyryozn.tex
% accompanying patterns for cyryo generated from ruhyphzn.tex
% 2004-06-03 converted to Unicode for XeTeX, Jonathan Kew
%
\patterns{
а5ё
а2мёр
ба2бь7ё
1бё
1б4лёс
блё2с3к
.бо6ё
1б2рёж
1б2рёз
1б2рёл
1б2ронё
бь5ё
1бь6ём
1бь6ёт
1бь6ёш
3в2ведён
1вё
1в2з2лёт
1в4лёк
1в2мё
1в2нё
1в2сё
1вьё.
1гё
гнё2з3д
1г4рё
1д2вёр
1д2воё
1дё
.до1ж2дёмс
.до1ж2дёт
1д2рёма
3душё
е5ё
е5ображён
е5одолён
4ё
ё2вро
ё2в3с4к
5ё2дин
ё4т5ся.
1жё
5ж6жён
1ж2мё
1ж2рё
1жьё.
за3мёр
3з2вёзд
1з2вёр
1зё
зё2м3ного
1з2меё
1з2наё
и5ё
и2мён
и5общё
1кё
1клеё
1клёв
1клёп
3ко2п3лённ
1к2раё
1к2рёст
1лё
3льё.
ль5ё
1ль6ём
1ль6ёт
1ль6ёш
1ль6нёт
1ль6нёш
5ль6щё
ме3жёв
1мё
мё3да
1мё2ж3
мёр2т3в
1м2щён
1мьё.
на3мёр
1нё
нё4в5ро5
нё1з2
нё1к2
нёро2в3
нё1с2
нё1т2
нё2т4с
нё3т5ся.
нё1х2
1ньё.
5о2б3рё
5объ3ё4м5
5о2долён
о5ё
о7ём.
о7ёму.
ои2мён
5о2т3чёт
перё1к2
1пё
5пё2т3р
1п2лемё
1п2лёл
1п2лённ
1п2лёно
1п2лё2с3к
1п2лёсн
1п2лёт
1п2лывё
1п2люё
по2д3вёр
по2д3вёрн
по6дотчё
1п2рё
прё1к2
при3мё
1п2ротё
1пьё.
пь5ё
1пь6ём
1пь6ёт
1пь6ёш
ра5вё
ра2в3нё
ра3з6о3бьё
ра4с5чётн
1р2вёт
1рё
рё4в3н
5р2ё3зон
ро2в3нё
1рьё.
1с2вёрл
.сво6ё
1с2вящён
1сё
1с2лоё
1с2мёл
1с2пёк
1с2плёт
3с4таёт
3с4тёгн
стё2к3л
3с4тёрт
3с4т2рём
3с4чётн
3съёмк
1т2вёрд
1т2вёрж
1тё
тё2м3н
1т2рём
3т4рёп
.трё2х3
ту2п3лён
3тьё.
у5ё
1фё
1х2лёб
3ц2вёл
четырё6х
1чё
чёр2к3н
чё2с3к
1ч2тён
1ч2тёт
1чьё.
1шё
шёр2с3т
1ш2лёп
1ш2лёт
1щё
ъ5ё
ъё2м
ь5ё
ю5ё
}
